Washington statutes.
RCW 18.265.040

Licensure without examination—Licensed in another state.

An applicant holding a valid license and currently engaged in practice in another state may be granted a license without examination required by this chapter, on the payment of any required fees, if the secretary determines that the other state's licensing standards are substantively equivalent to the standards in this state: PROVIDED, That the secretary may require the applicant to: (1) File with the secretary documentation certifying the applicant is licensed to practice in another state; and (2) provide information as the secretary deems necessary pertaining to the conditions and criteria of the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, and to demonstrate to the secretary a knowledge of Washington law pertaining to the practice of dental therapy.

[ 2023 c 460 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 460 ss 1-22: See note following RCW 18.265.005.